Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3502
Geology; regulation.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property and to promote the public welfare, the profession of geology is declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. The practice of geology and use of the title professional geologist is a privilege granted by the state.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 50;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 2.